Florida, session 2026, HB1441.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of section
121.35, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
121.35 Optional retirement program for the State
University System.—
(4) CONTRIBUTIONS.—
(a)1. Through June 30, 2001, each employer shall
contribute on behalf of each member of the optional retirement
program an amount equal to the normal cost portion of the
employer retirement contribution which would be required if the
employee were a regular member of the Florida Retirement System
Pension Plan, plus the portion of the contribution rate required
in s. 112.363(8) that would otherwise be assigned to the Retiree
Health Insurance Subsidy Trust Fund.
2. Effective July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2011, each
employer shall contribute on behalf of each member of the
optional retirement program an amount equal to 10.43 percent of
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1441-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1441 2026
the employee's gross monthly compensation.
3. Effective July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2012, each
member of the optional retirement program shall contribute an
amount equal to the employee contribution required in s.
121.71(3). The employer shall contribute on behalf of each such
member an amount equal to the difference between 10.43 percent
of the employee's gross monthly compensation and the amount
equal to the employee's required contribution based on the
employee's gross monthly compensation.
4. Effective July 1, 2012, through June 30, 2026, each
member of the optional retirement program shall contribute an
amount equal to the employee contribution required in s.
121.71(3). The employer shall contribute on behalf of each such
member an amount equal to the difference between 8.15 percent of
the employee's gross monthly compensation and the amount equal
to the employee's required contribution based on the employee's
gross monthly compensation.
5. Effective July 1, 2026, each member of the optional
retirement program shall contribute an amount equal to the
employee contribution required in s. 121.71(3). The employer
shall contribute an amount equal to the employer contribution
required in s. 121.71(4) and (5).
6.5. The payment of the contributions, including
contributions by the employee, shall be made by the employer to
the department, which shall forward the contributions to the
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1441-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1441 2026
designated company or companies contracting for payment of
benefits for members of the program in the same manner as other
retirement contributions. However, such contributions paid on
behalf of an employee described in paragraph (3)(c) may not be
forwarded to a company and do not begin to accrue interest until
the employee has executed a contract and notified the
department. The department shall deduct an amount from the
contributions to provide for the administration of this program.
Section 2. Paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of section
1012.875, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1012.875 State Community College System Optional
Retirement Program.—Each Florida College System institution may
implement an optional retirement program, if such program is
established therefor pursuant to s. 1001.64(20), under which
annuity or other contracts providing retirement and death
benefits may be purchased by, and on behalf of, eligible
employees who participate in the program, in accordance with s.
403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code. Except as otherwise
provided herein, this retirement program, which shall be known
as the State Community College System Optional Retirement
Program, may be implemented and administered only by an
individual Florida College System institution or by a consortium
of Florida College System institutions.
(4)(a)1. Through June 30, 2011, each college must
contribute on behalf of each program member an amount equal to
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1441-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1441 2026
10.43 percent of the employee's gross monthly compensation.
2. Effective July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2012, each
member shall contribute an amount equal to the employee
contribution required under s. 121.71(3). The employer shall
contribute on behalf of each program member an amount equal to
the difference between 10.43 percent of the employee's gross
monthly compensation and the employee's required contribution
based on the employee's gross monthly compensation.
3. Effective July 1, 2012, through June 30, 2026, each
member shall contribute an amount equal to the employee
contribution required under s. 121.71(3). The employer shall
contribute on behalf of each program member an amount equal to
the difference between 8.15 percent of the employee's gross
monthly compensation and the employee's required contribution
based on the employee's gross monthly compensation.
4. Effective July 1, 2026, each member shall contribute an
amount equal to the employee contribution required in s.
121.71(3). The employer shall contribute an amount equal to the
employer contribution required in s. 121.71(4) and (5).
5.4. The college shall deduct an amount approved by the
district board of trustees of the college to provide for the
administration of the optional retirement program. Payment of
this contribution must be made in the same manner as other
retirement contributions directly by the college or through the
100 program administrator to the designated company contracting for
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1441-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1441 2026
101 payment of benefits to the program member.
102 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1441-00